Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,165
Beekeeping; inspections; rules and regulations; duties of department and director.

The department is authorized to enforce the Nebraska Apiary Act. The director may make or cause to be made all necessary examinations and inspections and adopt and promulgate such rules, regulations, and orders as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the department under the act.

The department within its authority and funding appropriated to carry out the purposes of the act may take all measures necessary to prevent the introduction, spread, or dissemination of any and all contagious or infectious diseases, parasites, or pests of honeybees and to bring or cause to be brought actions and proceedings in the name of the people of the State of Nebraska to fulfill its duties under the act.

Laws 1929, c. 9, § 1, p. 76;

C.S.1929, § 81-2701;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,165;

Laws 1965, c. 548, § 1, p. 1752;

Laws 1967, c. 583, § 1, p. 1964;

Laws 1971, LB 403, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 1001, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 42;

Laws 1994, LB 1071, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 835, § 1.